Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
PART 1 Corporations

53-12-180.
Automatic amendment of articles of incorporation of corporate private foundation.

Notwithstanding any provision therein to the contrary and except as provided in Code Section 53-12-181, the articles of incorporation of any corporation which is a private foundation shall be amended automatically as of the later of the date of incorporation or January 1, 1972, to provide that the corporation shall:

Not engage in any act of self-dealing, as defined in Section 4941(d) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by Section 4941 of the federal Internal Revenue Code;

Not retain any excess business holdings, as defined in Section 4943(c) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by Section 4943 of the federal Internal Revenue Code;

Not make any investments which would jeopardize the carrying out of any of the exempt purposes of the corporation, within the meaning of Section 4944 of the federal Internal Revenue Code, so as to give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by Section 4944 of the federal Internal Revenue Code;

Not make any taxable expenditures, as defined in Section 4945(d) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, which would give rise to any liability for the tax imposed by Section 4945 of the federal Internal Revenue Code; and

Distribute for the purpose specified in its articles of incorporation for each taxable year amounts at least sufficient to avoid any liability for the tax imposed by Section 4942 of the federal Internal Revenue Code.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-180

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-181.
Amendment of articles of incorporation to exclude application of Code Section 53-12-180.

Any corporation which is a private foundation may amend its articles of incorporation expressly to exclude the application of Code Section 53-12-180 or any portion thereof in the manner provided by Article 10 of Chapter 2 of Title 14 or Article 8 of Chapter 3 of Title 14, whichever is applicable.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-181

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2010, Code Section 53-112-181, as enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 53-12-181.

53-12-182.
Effect of
Code Sections 53-12-180 and 53-12-181 as to forfeiture or reversion of trust property.

Nothing contained in Code Sections 53-12-180 and 53-12-181 shall cause or be construed to cause a forfeiture or reversion of any of the property of a corporation which is subject to such Code sections.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-182

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-183.
Election of private foundation to distribute such property as will enable corporation to avoid tax liability.

With respect to property held by a corporation which is a private foundation and which is subject to conditions which permit distributions to the extent of the net income of the property each year but do not permit distributions of the property or any part thereof itself, the directors of the corporation may elect to distribute so much of the property as may be necessary to enable the corporation to avoid liability for any tax imposed by Section 4942 of the federal Internal Revenue Code in the same manner as if the corporation were a trust described in Code Section 53-12-193 and the property were the only property held in the trust and as if the directors were the trustees of the trust.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-183

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-184.
Effect of Code Sections 53-12-180 through 53-12-183 on powers of the courts or the Attorney General.

Nothing in Code Sections 53-12-180 through 53-12-183 shall impair the rights and powers of the courts or the Attorney General of this state with respect to any corporation.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-184

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.